Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1361
Crematory; change in location, ownership, or name; application; requirements; fee.

(1) A crematory authority desiring to relocate a crematory shall file a written application with the department at least thirty days prior to the designated date of such relocation. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department in rules and regulations.

(2) A crematory authority desiring to change ownership of a crematory shall file a written application with the department at least thirty days prior to the designated date of such change. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department in rules and regulations.

(3) A crematory authority desiring to change its name shall file a written application with the department at least thirty days prior to such change. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department in rules and regulations.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1188.